District of Columbia statutes.
34-2106

Repealed

Payment of sanitary sewer service charges.

Repealed.

Oct. 21, 1975, D.C. Law 1-23, title VII, § 701(c), 22 DCR 2115
repealed pursuant to § 304 of D.C. Law 11-111
1981 Ed., § 43-1606.
1973 Ed., § 43-1605b.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 4(d) of the Confirmation Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-25, March 15, 1999, 46 DCR 2971).
Repeal effective 90 days after meeting of Board: Section 304 of D.C. Law 11-111 repealed this section. However, § 601 of D.C. Law 11-111 provided that title III of the act shall apply 90 days after the initial meeting of the Board established by section 204 of the act.